Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 2. Rights and Obligations

§ 6.20.
Differences in rights and obligations of members.

All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption, and transfer, unless the articles or bylaws establish classes of membership with different rights or obligations. All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to any other matters, except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.21.
Transfers.

Except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, no member of a mutual benefit corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

No member of a public benefit corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction on them shall be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the members and the affected member.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.22.
Member’s liability to third parties.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.23.
Member’s liability for dues, assessments, and fees.

A member may become liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees; provided, however, that an article or bylaw provision or a resolution adopted by the board authorizing or imposing dues, assessments, or fees does not, of itself, create liability.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.24.
Creditor’s action against member.

No proceeding may be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceeding would be useless.

All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor’s proceeding brought under subsection (a) of this section to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation. Any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.